Hawaii, session 2026, SB2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 453, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§453-     Active retired clinician license; volunteer clinical work; community-based health care or public health organizations.  (a) The board may issue an active retired clinician license to a physician, osteopathic physician, or surgeon with an inactive Hawaii medical license to provide volunteer clinical work through a community-based health care or public health organization. (b)  To receive an active retired clinician license, the applicant: (1)  Shall complete an application as prescribed by the board and pay a fee of $100; (2)  Shall have been in good standing at the time the applicant's Hawaii medical license became inactive or expired; (3)  Shall have participated in active clinical practice with the last five years; (4)  Shall not hold an active status medical license in any state; (5)  Shall not be the subject of a pending or active complaint, investigation, consent order, board order, or pending disciplinary proceeding in any jurisdiction; and (6)  Shall not have surrendered a license while under investigation or had a license revoked in any jurisdiction. (c)  The board shall establish by rule any continuing medical education standards for holders of an active retired clinician license.  The standards shall be at least equal to half of those required for physicians, osteopathic physicians, and surgeons under section 453-6. (d)  Failure to renew, pay the renewal fee, or provide documentation of compliance with any continuing medical education requirements shall constitute a forfeiture of license, which may be restored only upon the submission of a written application therefor, payment to the board of a restoration fee, and documentation of compliance. (e)  Every holder of an active retired clinician license shall renew the license with the board no later than January 31 of each year.  A renewal fee of $100 shall be due at the time of renewal. (f)  No holder of an active retired clinician license issued pursuant to this section shall: (1)  Open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, or receive calls from patients relating to the practice of medicine beyond the parameters of the community-based health care or public health organization that is sponsoring and monitoring the licensee's activities; or (2)  Receive any form of compensation for the provision of clinical work through a community-based health care or public health organization. (g)  The holder of an active retired clinician license shall obey all laws and rules of the State." SECTION 2.  Section 453-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall practice medicine or surgery in the State, either gratuitously or for pay, or offer to practice medicine or surgery in the State, or advertise or announce one's self, either publicly or privately, as prepared or qualified to practice medicine or surgery in the State, or append the letters "Dr.", "M.D.", or "D.O." to one's name with the intent to imply that the person is a practitioner of medicine or surgery, without having a valid unrevoked license, active retired clinician license, or a limited and temporary license obtained from the Hawaii medical board." SECTION 3.  Section 453-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  No applicant shall be examined under this chapter until the applicant has paid to the board application, examination, and license fees. The board may provide separate fees for licensure by endorsement, active retired clinician licenses, and for limited and temporary licenses." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________